Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2641.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 10.93 RCW to read as follows:(1) A general authority Washington law enforcement agency or a limited authority Washington law enforcement agency may not employ any individual who was hired as a sworn officer of the United States immigration and customs enforcement on or after January 20, 2025.(2) This section applies prospectively only and does not apply to any individual hired by the agency prior to the effective date of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act takes effect October 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This act may be known and cited as the ICE out act of 2026.--- END ---